District of Columbia statutes.
46-230

Public Information Program.

The Mayor shall ensure that an extensive program of public information detailing the effects of this subchapter is undertaken within 30 calendar days of February 24, 1987.

History

Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-166, § 31, 33 DCR 6710

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 30-530.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-166, see Mayor’s Order 87-273, December 10, 1987.